Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
SUBPART B
BEDS AND FACILITIES

19-2.5-1511. Juvenile detention services and facilities to be provided by department of human services - education - expenses - definition.

Except as set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the department of human services shall provide detention services for temporary care of a juvenile, pursuant to this article 2.5. The department of human services shall consult on a regular basis
with the court in any district where a detention facility is located concerning the detention program at that facility. The department of human services may use staff secure facilities to provide preadjudication and postadjudication
detention services.

Detention facilities operated by or under contract with the department of human services, subject to limitations on physical capacity and programs, shall receive and provide care for any juvenile arrested for or convicted of a violation of any provision
of articles 1 to 15 of title 33, or any rule promulgated thereunder, or any article of title 42, or any municipal or county ordinance and for any juvenile found in contempt of court in connection with a violation or an
alleged violation of any of those articles or any municipal or county ordinance.

The department of human services is not required to receive and provide care for any juvenile who is ten years of age and older but less than thirteen years of age, unless such juvenile has been arrested or adjudicated for a felony or weapons charge pursuant
to section 18-12-102, 18-12-105, 18-12-106, or 18-12-108.5.

Detention facilities operated in part by a state court, pursuant to section 13-3-108, must be operated in the same manner by the department of human services, within the limits of available funds appropriated for such purpose.

Juveniles in a juvenile detention facility are exempt from compulsory school attendance requirements pursuant to section 22-33-104 (2)(f). However, it is the intent of the general assembly that the juvenile detention facility and school district in which
the facility is located cooperate to ensure that each juvenile who is in detention is offered educational services at the grade level identified for the juvenile in a time frame that aligns with the hourly requirements
for attendance specified in section 22-33-104 (1). (3) (a) (I) Juveniles in a juvenile detention facility are exempt from compulsory school attendance requirements pursuant to section 22-33-104 (2)(f). However,
it is the intent of the general assembly that the juvenile detention facility and school district in which the facility is located cooperate to ensure that each juvenile who is in detention is offered educational
services at the grade level identified for the juvenile in a time frame that aligns with the hourly requirements for attendance specified in section 22-33-104 (1).

The school boards of the school districts that a juvenile detention facility serves or in which the juvenile detention facility is located, when requested by the judge of the juvenile court, shall furnish teachers and any books or equipment needed to
provide educational services that align with, and are designed to assist each juvenile in achieving, the statewide model content standards adopted pursuant to section 22-7-1005 for each juvenile's identified grade
level. The school districts and the personnel at the detention facility shall cooperate to ensure that the educational services are available to the juveniles in the facility in a time frame that aligns with the
hourly requirements for attendance specified in section 22-33-104 (1).

The expenses incurred by a school district pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, minus the total amount of per-pupil revenues that the school district receives pursuant to article 54 of title 22 for the juveniles in the juvenile detention facility,
shall be shared and paid by each school district served in the proportion that the enrollment of each school district bears to the total enrollment of all the districts served.

For the 2006-07 budget year and each budget year thereafter, the expenses incurred by a school district pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section shall be shared and paid by the school district, each charter school of the district, and each institute
charter school located in the school district. Each charter school of the district and institute charter school shall pay in the proportion that the charter school of the district's or institute charter school's
enrollment bears to the total district enrollment.

As used in this subsection (3)(c), "total district enrollment" means:

For the 2022-23 budget year, the total of the pupil enrollment in the school district, plus the district online enrollment, the district preschool program enrollment, and the pupil enrollment in each institute charter school that is located within the
school district, as determined in accordance with article 54 of title 22;

For the 2023-24 budget year and budget years thereafter, the total of the pupil enrollment in the school district, plus the district online enrollment and the pupil enrollment in each institute charter school that is located within the school district,
as determined in accordance with article 54 of title 22.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 694, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
(3)(c)(II) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 834, § 36, effective July 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-402 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1512. Use of juvenile detention beds.

A juvenile committed to the department of human services pursuant to article 3 of this title 19 must not be placed in a juvenile detention bed unless the juvenile is subject to an action proceeding pursuant to this article 2.5.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 696, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1204 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1513. Juvenile detention facilities - catchment areas.

The executive director of the department of human services and the state court administrator in the judicial department shall together establish geographical catchment areas for the juvenile detention facilities operated by or under contract with the
department of human services. To the extent practicable, the detention catchment areas must be established to ensure that the juvenile is held in a juvenile detention facility located within the judicial district in which
the juvenile's offense is committed. For judicial districts in which a juvenile detention facility is not located, the department of human services shall establish the catchment areas based on considerations of proximity,
bed availability, workload, and cost efficiency.

On or before October 1, 1998, and each October 1 thereafter, the working group established in section 19-2.5-1404 shall submit recommendations to the executive director of the department of human services and the state court administrator concerning configuration
of the detention catchment areas and the placement of detained juveniles.

On or before December 1, 1998, the executive director of the department of human services and the state court administrator shall submit a description of the detention catchment areas to the joint budget committee and to the judiciary committees of the
senate and house of representatives. The executive director and the state court administrator shall annually reexamine the detention catchment areas and submit a description of any changes in the detention catchment area boundaries
to the joint budget committee and to the judiciary committees of the senate and house of representatives, or any successor committees, by December 1.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 696, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-402.5 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1514. Juvenile detention bed cap.

For the fiscal year 2021-22 and each fiscal year thereafter, the number of available juvenile detention beds statewide is limited to two hundred fifteen.

Source:

L. 2021:
(4) amended and (5) added, (SB 21-071), ch. 463, p. 3335, § 4, effective July 6; entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 696, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:
Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2972, § 40, effective August 10.

19-2.5-1515. Judicial districts - plans for the cap.

Each judicial district shall annually develop a plan to manage the limit on the number of juvenile detention beds allocated to the judicial district by the working group pursuant to section 19-2.5-1405 (1)(a). The judicial district shall consider the
emergency release guidelines and placement guidelines developed pursuant to section 19-2.5-1405 in its annual plan to manage the limit. The annual plan developed by the judicial district must ensure the judicial district does not exceed
the number of juvenile detention beds allocated to it pursuant to section 19-2.5-1405.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 697, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-1203 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1516. Juvenile detention facilities - behavioral or mental health disorder screening.

The executive director of the department of human services may implement a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program to screen juveniles held in juvenile detention facilities following adjudication. If the executive director chooses to implement
a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program, the executive director shall use the standardized behavioral or mental health disorder screening developed pursuant to section 16-11.9-102 and conduct the screening in accordance
with procedures established pursuant to said section.

Prior to implementation of a behavioral or mental health disorder screening program pursuant to this section, if implementation of the program would require an increase in appropriations, the executive director shall submit to the joint budget committee
a request for funding in the amount necessary to implement the behavioral or mental health disorder screening program. If implementation of the behavioral or mental health disorder screening program would require an increase in
appropriations, implementation of the program is conditional upon approval of the funding request.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 697, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-417 as it existed prior to 2021.

19-2.5-1517. Transfer of detention facilities and equipment.

Whenever the department of human services determines that any property, facilities, and equipment are no longer needed for juvenile detention facilities, the department shall transfer said property, facilities, and equipment back to the county without
any cost to the county.

Source:

L. 2021:
Entire article added with relocations, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 697, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:
This section is similar to former § 19-2-412 as it existed prior to 2021.